Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 2.2:1. Emergency Petroleum Products Supply Act.

§ 59.1-21.18:2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise, the following terms and phrases shall have the following meanings:

“Petroleum products” shall mean kerosene and number one and two heating oils;

“Supplier” shall mean any person, partnership, company, corporation or association engaged in the refining and subsequent sale of petroleum products to any distributor in the Commonwealth;

“Distributor” shall mean any distributor, wholesaler, jobber, consignee or commission agent who purchases or otherwise acquires possession of or an interest in petroleum products under a contract of supply in the Commonwealth from a supplier for redistribution
or wholesale sale;

“Monthly allocation” shall mean the monthly amount of petroleum products sold or otherwise supplied to a distributor under applicable U.S. Department of Energy regulations and rules, or which the supplier may otherwise be allocating to its distributors;

“To discontinue” shall mean the failure or refusal to sell a monthly allocation as defined herein to a distributor for a period of six consecutive months unless such failure or refusal is the direct and proximate result of force majeure;

“To reduce” shall mean the failure or refusal of a supplier to deliver at least seventy-five per centum of a monthly allocation to a distributor for a period of two consecutive months unless such failure or refusal is the direct and proximate result of
an allocation percentage factor applied by the supplier to all its distributors or force majeure;

“Force majeure” means an act of God or any other cause not reasonably within the control of the supplier.

History.
1980, c. 457.

§ 59.1-21.18:3.
Prohibited acts.

Except in the event of failure by any distributor in the Commonwealth to comply with the material requirements imposed upon him by a contract or agreement with the supplier, other than a failure caused by force majeure; or except as may be required by
an agency of the federal or state government responsible for regulating allocations of petroleum products; or except as provided in § 59.1-21.18:4, it shall be unlawful for any supplier:

To discontinue monthly allocations of petroleum products to a distributor, his successors in interest or qualified assigns provided that such successors in interest or qualified assigns meet the supplier’s usual contract acceptance criteria; or

To reduce monthly allocations of petroleum products to a Virginia distributor, his successors in interest or qualified assigns provided that such successors in interest or qualified assigns meet the supplier’s usual contract acceptance criteria.

History.
1980, c. 457.

§ 59.1-21.18:4.
Exemptions under chapter.

A supplier shall be authorized to reduce or discontinue monthly allocations of petroleum products with any Virginia distributor if the supplier:

Furnishes the distributor with an alternative source of monthly allocations of petroleum products of equal type, grade, quantity and equivalent delivery location; or

Agrees to supply the distributor with monthly allocations of petroleum products for a period of twelve months and furnishes the distributor and the Governor of the Commonwealth with written notice of its intention to discontinue or reduce such allocations
at least twelve months in advance of such discontinuance or reduction.

History.
1980, c. 457.